Alaska, session 34, HB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 47.10.013(c) is amended to read: 04 (c) A parent who is immune from prosecution under AS 11.81.500 and 05 chooses to surrender an infant shall surrender the infant in the manner described in this 06 subsection. Surrendering the infant in the manner described in this subsection 07 constitutes abandonment for purposes of this chapter. An infant's parent is considered 08 to have abandoned the infant safely, and, notwithstanding AS 25.20.030 and 09 AS 47.10.120, the parent's legal duty to support the infant is extinguished if 10 (1) the parent, without expressing an intent to return for the infant, 11 leaves the infant 12 (A) in the physical custody of a person who 13 (i) [IS A (A) PERSON] the parent reasonably believes 14 would provide for the health and safety of the infant and who would act 15 appropriately to care for the infant; 01 (ii) is a [(B)] peace officer, community health aide, 02 physician, or hospital employee; or 03 (iii) [(C) PERSON WHO] is employed by or is a 04 volunteer for a fire department or emergency medical service, if the 05 person is acting within the scope of the person's fire department or 06 emergency medical service duties; or 07 (B) in an infant safety device that 08 (i) is physically affixed to an exterior wall or located 09 inside of a hospital, emergency department, freestanding birth 10 center as defined in AS 47.32.900, office of a private physician 11 whether in individual or group practice, rural health clinic as 12 defined in AS 47.32.900, municipal police department, state trooper 13 post, fire department, or other facility designated by the 14 commissioner as an appropriate location for an infant safety device 15 under regulations adopted by the commissioner; and 16 (ii) meets the requirements of (h) of this section; and 17 (2) there is no evidence the infant has been physically injured before 18 abandonment. 19 * Sec. 2. AS 47.10.013(d) is amended to read: 20 (d) A person to whom an infant is surrendered in the manner described in 21 (c)(1)(A)(ii) or (iii) [(c)(1)(B) OR (C)] of this section shall 22 (1) act appropriately to care for the infant; 23 (2) inform the parent that the parent may, but is not required to, answer 24 any questions regarding the name, identity, and medical history of the infant and 25 parents of the infant unless the parent chooses to contact the department under (3) of 26 this subsection; 27 (3) ask the parent if the parent wishes to relinquish the parent's 28 parental rights and release the infant for adoption; if the answer is affirmative, the 29 person shall contact the department so that the parent can discuss that option with the 30 department; 31 (4) immediately notify the nearest office of the department that the 01 infant has been surrendered in the manner described in (c)(1)(A)(ii) or (iii) [(c)] of this 02 section. 03 * Sec. 3. AS 47.10.013(e) is amended to read: 04 (e) An individual, agency, designated facility, or entity that receives an infant 05 abandoned safely under (c) of this section is not liable for civil damages for failure to 06 discharge the duties listed in (d) of this section. 07 * Sec. 4. AS 47.10.013 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 08 (g) A designated facility that receives an infant surrendered under (c)(1)(B) of 09 this section shall immediately notify the nearest office of the department that the infant 10 has been surrendered under (c)(1)(B) of this section. 11 (h) An infant safety device must be 12 (1) located in an area that is conspicuous and visible to employees of a 13 designated facility; 14 (2) climate-controlled; 15 (3) clearly marked with appropriate signage, as determined by the 16 department; and 17 (4) equipped with 18 (A) a system that automatically transmits a request to the 911 19 emergency system for the immediate dispatch of an emergency medical 20 services provider to the location of the infant safety device when the infant 21 safety device is opened; 22 (B) a video surveillance system that allows employees of the 23 designated facility to monitor the interior of the infant safety device 24 hours a 24 day; and 25 (C) an automated lock that secures the infant inside the infant 26 safety device after deposit. 27 (i) The department may provide training to emergency medical service 28 providers, 911 operators, hospital staff, firefighters, law enforcement officers, and 29 employees of a designated facility in how to implement and comply with the 30 requirements for the surrender of an infant as described in this section. 31 (j) In this section, "designated facility" means a facility described in 01 (c)(1)(B)(i) of this section that has an infant safety device located at the facility. 02 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.